apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="t/önn__n">
      <e>       <p><l>önn</l>       <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önnin</l>     <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ennur</l>     <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ennurnar</l>  <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önn</l>       <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önnina</l>    <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ennur</l>     <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ennurnar</l>  <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önn</l>       <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önninni</l>   <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önnum</l>     <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önnunum</l>   <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>annar</l>     <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>annarinnar</l><r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>annanna</l>   <r>önn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="þjónust/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unni</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="þág/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="veg/ur__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urinn</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irnir</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inum</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arins</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="þrist/ur__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urinn</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arnir</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inum</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sins</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="þjónusta">        <i>þjónust</i><par n="þjónust/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tönn">            <i>t</i><par n="t/önn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þristur">         <i>þrist</i><par n="þrist/ur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þága">            <i>þág</i><par n="þág/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vegur">           <i>veg</i><par n="veg/ur__n"/></e>
